Utah statutes.
17D-3-306.   Eligibility to vote in an election for board of supervisors members.

A person is eligible to vote in an election of members of the board of supervisors of a conservation district if the person:

(1) (a)  is a registered voter; and

(b)  resides within the conservation district; or

(2) (a)  owns or operates private agricultural land in the conservation district; and

(b) (i)  requests a ballot; or

(ii)  has voted in one of the last two elections of the conservation district's board of supervisors members.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

